Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.090

Action to cancel tax deed.

Actions to set aside or cancel any deed heretofore or hereafter issued by any county treasurer after and upon the sale of lands for general, state, county or municipal taxes, or upon the sale of lands acquired by any county on foreclosure of general, state, county or municipal taxes, or for the recovery of any lands so sold, must be brought within three years from and after the date of the issuance of such treasurer's deed.

[ 1949 c 74 s 1; 1907 c 173 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 162.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Transitional proviso omitted. The proviso reads: "PROVIDED, This act shall not apply to actions not otherwise barred on deeds heretofore issued if the same be commenced within one year after the passage of this act".